Wyoming, session 2025, HB0242.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-16-101(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xxxii), 31-16-103(a) by creating a new paragraph
(ix) and 31-16-124 by creating a new subsection (g) are
amended to read:
31-16-101. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(xxxii) "Sales authorization" means a document
from a manufacturer or distributor of trailers as defined
by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxiii) that does not contract through
enfranchisement, authorizing a dealer to engage in the
business of selling any specified make of trailer other
than a house trailer as defined by W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xxiii)(A) or a semitrailer as defined by W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xxiii)(B).
31-16-103. Licenses; applications; issuance,
suspension and revocation; change in ownership; rulemaking.
(a) An applicant for a license required under this
act shall, before commencing business and annually
thereafter submit an application to the department in a
form prescribed by the department containing the following:
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0242
ENROLLED ACT NO. 34, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ix) For a new vehicle dealer's license to sell
trailers as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxiii), if the
sales agreement does not involve enfranchisement, a sales
authorization from the manufacturer or distributor stating
that the dealer is authorized to sell any specific make of
new trailer other than a house trailer as defined by W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xxiii)(A) or a semitrailer as defined by W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xxiii)(B).
31-16-124. Applicability of provisions.
(g) The provisions of W.S. 31-16-109 through
31-16-111, 31-16-113, 31-16-114 and 31-16-117 shall not
apply to dealers or manufacturers of new trailers other
than a house trailer as defined by W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xxiii)(A) or a semitrailer as defined by W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xxiii)(B). The provisions of W.S. 31-16-108
shall not apply to manufacturers of new trailers other than
a house trailer as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxiii)(A) or
a semitrailer as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxiii)(B).
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0242
ENROLLED ACT NO. 34, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3